Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Department of Early Learning  and Care, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,  out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the
following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 71,472,929
(2) Early learning programs ........... $668,879,857
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Early  Learning and Care, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
out of  the General Fund, the amount of $652,707, for deposit into the Tribal Early Learning
Fund established by section 3, chapter __, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill 2815).
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds, corporate activity tax funds transferred from the Early Learning Ac-
count by the Department of Education and federal funds, collected or  received by the
Department of Early Learning and Care, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 7,558,728
(2) Early learning programs ........... $ 13,442,253
SECTION 4.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal  funds collected or received by the Department of Early Learning
and Care, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 57,030,987
(2) Early learning programs ........... $189,975,785
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses for  operations, grants-in-aid, program costs and purchased services by the De-
partment of Early Learning and Care from corporate activity tax funds transferred from the
Early Learning Account by the Department of Education, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 7,250,539
Enrolled Senate Bill 5514 (SB 5514-A) Page 1
(2) Early learning programs ........... $433,296,509
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by Senate June 16, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5514 (SB 5514-A) Page 2